Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 4901.
Statement of purposes.

The Department may cooperate with the appropriate federal agency for the purpose of establishing, extending, and strengthening services that supplement or substitute for parental care and supervision, including:

preventing, remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems that may result in neglect, abuse, exploitation, or delinquency of children;

protecting and caring for homeless, dependent, or neglected children;

protecting and promoting the welfare of children of working parents;

otherwise protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the strengthening of their homes where possible or, where needed, providing adequate care away from their homes in child-care facilities; and

assisting youth in a successful transition to an independent adulthood, including the avoidance of homelessness, incarceration, and substance abuse.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 5; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 117;

2007, No. 74

, § 1, eff. June 6, 2007.

§ 4902.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Child” means a person under 18 years of age committed by the Family Division of the Superior Court to the Department for Children and Families.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner for Children and Families.

“Department” means the Department for Children and Families.

“Foster care” means care of a child, for a valuable consideration, in a child care institution or in a family other than that of the child’s parent, guardian, or relative.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 5; amended

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 22, 31, eff. April 14, 1974;

1981, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 20, 1982;

1983, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1989, No. 42

, eff. May 5, 1989;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 118;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 74, eff. May 20, 2014;

2021, No. 20

, § 333.

§ 4903.
Responsibility of Department.

The Department may expend, within amounts available for the purposes, what is necessary to protect and promote the welfare of children and adults in this State, including the strengthening of their homes whenever possible, by:

Investigating complaints of neglect, abuse, or abandonment of children.

Providing aid and services to the extent necessary for the purpose of permitting children to remain in their own homes.

Supervising and controlling children committed to it by a court.

Providing substitute parental care and custody for a child upon application of his or her parent, guardian, or any person acting in behalf of the child, when after investigation it is found that the care and custody will be in the best interests of the child. The acceptance of a child by the Department shall not abrogate parental rights or responsibilities, but the Department may accept from the parents temporary delegation of certain rights and responsibilities necessary to provide care and custody for a period of up to six months under conditions agreed upon by the parents and the Department. Upon a stipulation approved by the Family Division of the Superior Court, the period may be extended for additional periods of up to six months each, provided that each extension is first determined by the parties to be necessary, and that it is in the best interests of the child.

Providing financial aid to persons who were committed to the Department at the time they attained the age of majority and who are completing an educational, vocational, or technical training program designed to equip them for gainful employment.

Providing aid to certain adopted children who prior to their adoption were in the care and custody of the Department.

Providing aid to a child in the permanent guardianship of a relative if the child was in the care and custody of the Department and was placed in the home of the relative for at least six months prior to the creation of the guardianship.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 5; amended

1971, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.);

1975, No. 19

;

1981, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 119;

2009, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 334.

§ 4904.
Foster care; transitional youth services.

As used in this section, “youth” means a person between 18 and 22 years of age who either:

attained his or her 18th birthday while in the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families; or

while he or she was between 10 and 18 years of age, spent at least five of those years in the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families.

The Department shall provide foster care services as described in subsection (c) of this section to:
(b) (1) The Department shall provide foster care services as described in subsection (c) of this section to:

any youth who elects to continue receiving such services after attaining the age of 18;

any individual under the age of 22 who leaves State custody after the age of 16 and at or before the age of 18 or any youth provided he or she voluntarily requests additional support services.

The Department shall require a youth receiving services under this section to be employed, to participate in a program to promote employment or remove barriers to employment, or to attend an educational or vocational program, and, if the youth is working, require that he or she contribute to the cost of services based on a sliding scale, unless the youth meets the criteria for an exception to the employment and educational or vocational program requirements of this section based on a disability or other good cause. The Department shall establish rules for the requirements and exceptions under this subdivision.

The Commissioner shall establish by rule a program to provide a range of age-appropriate services for youth to ensure a successful transition to adulthood, including foster care and other services provided under this chapter to children as appropriate, housing assistance, transportation, case management services, assistance with obtaining and retaining health care coverage or employment, and other services. At least 12 months prior to a child attaining his or her 18th birthday, the Department shall assist the child in developing a transition plan. When developing the transition plan, the child shall be informed about the range of age-appropriate services and assistance available in applying for or obtaining these services.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 74

, § 2, eff. June 6, 2007; amended

2009, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 102.

§ 4905.
Foster care and placement licensing.

A person other than an employee of a department within the Agency of Human Services shall not place any child in foster care for more than 15 consecutive days unless the person has a license from the Department to do so or is an employee of a child-placing agency licensed by that Department.

A person shall not receive, board, or keep any child in foster care for more than 15 consecutive days unless he or she has a license from the Department to do so. This subsection shall not apply to foster homes approved by a department within the Agency of Human Services or by a licensed child-placing agency, nor shall it apply to those facilities where educational or vocational training is the primary service and foster care is a supportive service only.

This section shall not restrict the right of a court, parent, guardian, or relative to place a child, nor the right of a person not in the business of providing foster care or child care to receive, board, and keep a child when a valuable consideration is not demanded or received for the child’s care and maintenance.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 75.

§ 4906.
Foster care; reasonable and prudent parent standard.

As used in this section:

“Caregiver” means a foster parent, including a kinship foster parent or residential treatment or other program, with whom a child or youth in the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families has been placed.

“Reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the standard characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety, and best interests of a child or youth in the custody of the Commissioner while at the same time encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child that a caregiver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in the custody of the Commissioner to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.

A caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent parent standard when determining whether to allow a child in the custody of the Commissioner to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.

A caregiver shall not be liable for injuries to a child in the custody of the Commissioner that occur as a result of acting in accordance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard. A caregiver acting in good faith in compliance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard shall be immune from civil liability arising from such action.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.